Georgia, session 2025_26, HB619.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act providing a new charter for the City of Donalsonville, approved April 29, 1997 (Ga.
L. 1997, p. 4524), as amended, is amended by revising Section 2.11 as follows:
"SECTION 2.11.
Terms and qualifications for office.
Except as provided for in Section 5.12, the mayor and each member of the council shall serve
for terms of four years and until their respective successors are elected and qualified. No
person shall be eligible to serve as mayor or councilmember unless he or she shall have been
H. B. 619
- 1 -

LC 47 3166/AP
a resident of the city for a period of at least 12 months immediately prior to the date of the
election of the mayor or members of the council; each shall continue to reside therein during
his or her period of service and to be registered and qualified to vote in municipal elections
of this city."
SECTION 2.
Said Act is further amended by revising Section 5.12 as follows:
"SECTION 5.12.
Regular elections; time for holding.
(a) The mayor and council shall cause an election to be held at the city hall or such other
place in the city as the mayor and council shall direct and designate. All general municipal
elections shall be held on the Tuesday next following the first Monday in November, 2025,
and on such day biennially thereafter. Except as provided for in subsection (b) of this
section, each elected officer shall serve for a term of four years and until a successor is
elected and qualified, such term beginning on January 1 of the year following the officer's
election.
(b) At the municipal general election held in November, 2025, there shall be elected a
mayor who shall serve a two year term of office and until a successor is elected and
qualified. The successor to such mayor shall be elected at the municipal general election
held in November, 2027, and shall serve a four year term of office until a successor is
elected an qualified. Thereafter the mayor shall be elected as provided for by
subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this Act, no term of office to which a person has
been elected prior to the effective date of this Act shall be shortened or lengthened except
pursuant to the procedures established by state law."
H. B. 619
- 2 -

LC 47 3166/AP
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 619
- 3 -